Washington statutes.
RCW 19.30.070

License—Contents.

Each license shall contain, on the face thereof:

(1) The name and address of the licensee and the fact that he or she is licensed to act as a farm labor contractor for the period upon the face of the license only;

(2) The number, date of issuance, and date of expiration of the license;

(3) The amount of the surety bond deposited by the licensee;

(4) The fact that the license may not be transferred or assigned; and

(5) A statement that the licensee is or is not licensed to transport workers.

[ 1985 c 280 s 7; 1955 c 392 s 7.]